Illinois, session 104th, SB1537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Loan Servicing Rights Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1-5 and 25-5 and by adding 6Article 7 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 992/1-5)8    Sec. 1-5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Applicant" means a person applying for a license pursuant 10to this Act.11    "Borrower" or "student loan borrower" means a person who 12has received or agreed to pay a student loan for his or her own 13educational expenses.14    "Cosigner" means any individual who is liable for the 15obligation of another without compensation, regardless of how 16the individual is designated in the contract or instrument 17with respect to that obligation, including an obligation under 18a private education loan extended to consolidate a borrower's 19preexisting student loans. The term includes any individual 20whose signature is requested, as a condition, to grant credit 21or to forbear on collection. The term does not include a spouse 22of an individual if the spouse's signature is needed solely to 23perfect the security interest in a loan.  SB1537 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    "Division of Banking" means the Division of Banking of the 4Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.5    "Federal loan borrower eligible for referral to a 6repayment specialist" means a borrower who possesses any of 7the following characteristics:8        (1) requests information related to options to reduce 9    or suspend his or her monthly payment;10        (2) indicates that he or she is experiencing or 11    anticipates experiencing financial hardship, distress, or 12    difficulty making his or her payments;13        (3) has missed 2 consecutive monthly payments;14        (4) is at least 75 days delinquent;15        (5) is enrolled in a discretionary forbearance for 16    more than 9 of the previous 12 months;17        (6) has rehabilitated or consolidated one or more 18    loans out of default within the past 12 months; or19        (7) has not completed a course of study, as reflected 20    in the servicer's records, or the borrower identifies 21    himself or herself as not having completed a program of 22    study.23    "Federal education loan" means any loan made, guaranteed, 24or insured under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act 25of 1965.26    "Income-driven payment plan certification" means the   SB1537 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1documentation related to a federal student loan borrower's 2income or financial status the borrower must submit to renew 3an income-driven repayment plan.4    "Income-driven repayment options" includes the 5Income-Contingent Repayment Plan, the Income-Based Repayment 6Plan, the Income-Sensitive Repayment Plan, the Pay As You Earn 7Plan, the Revised Pay As You Earn Plan, and any other federal 8student loan repayment plan that is calculated based on a 9borrower's income.10    "Licensee" means a person licensed pursuant to this Act.11    "Other repayment plans" means the Standard Repayment Plan, 12the Graduated Repayment Plan, the Extended Repayment Plan, or 13any other federal student loan repayment plan not based on a 14borrower's income.15    "Private education loan" has the meaning ascribed to the 16term in Section 140 of the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 17U.S.C. 1650). In addition, "private education loan" includes 18an income share agreement and student financing. 19    "Private loan borrower eligible for referral to a 20repayment specialist" means a borrower who possesses any of 21the following characteristics:22        (1) requests information related to options to reduce 23    or suspend his or her monthly payments; or24        (2) indicates that he or she is experiencing or 25    anticipates experiencing financial hardship, distress, or 26    difficulty making his or her payments.  SB1537 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    "Requester" means any borrower or cosigner that submits a 2request for assistance.3    "Request for assistance" means all inquiries, complaints, 4account disputes, and requests for documentation a servicer 5receives from borrowers or cosigners.6    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 7Professional Regulation, or his or her designee, including the 8Director of the Division of Banking of the Department of 9Financial and Professional Regulation.10    "Servicing" means: (1) receiving any scheduled periodic 11payments from a student loan borrower or cosigner pursuant to 12the terms of a student loan; (2) applying the payments of 13principal and interest and such other payments with respect to 14the amounts received from a student loan borrower or cosigner, 15as may be required pursuant to the terms of a student loan; and 16(3) performing other administrative services with respect to a 17student loan.18    "Student loan" or "loan" means any federal education loan 19or other loan primarily for use to finance a postsecondary 20education and costs of attendance at a postsecondary 21institution, including, but not limited to, tuition, fees, 22books and supplies, room and board, transportation, and 23miscellaneous personal expenses. "Student loan" includes a 24loan made to refinance a student loan.25    "Student loan" shall not include an extension of credit 26under an open-end consumer credit plan, a reverse mortgage   SB1537 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other 2loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.3    "Student loan" shall not include an extension of credit 4made by a postsecondary educational institution to a borrower 5if one of the following apply:6        (1) The term of the extension of credit is no longer 7    than the borrower's education program.8        (2) The remaining, unpaid principal balance of the 9    extension of credit is less than $1,500 at the time of the 10    borrower's graduation or completion of the program.11        (3) The borrower fails to graduate or successfully 12    complete his or her education program and has a balance 13    due at the time of his or her disenrollment from the 14    postsecondary institution.15    "Student loan servicer" or "servicer" means any person 16engaged in the business of servicing student loans. "Student 17loan servicer" or "servicer" includes persons or entities 18acting on behalf of the State Treasurer. "Student loan 19servicer" includes an EISA provider covered under Article 7 of 20this Act. 21    "Student loan servicer" shall not include:22        (1) a bank, savings bank, savings association, or 23    credit union organized under the laws of the State or any 24    other state or under the laws of the United States;25        (2) a wholly owned subsidiary of any bank, savings 26    bank, savings association, or credit union organized under   SB1537 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    the laws of the State or any other state or under the laws 2    of the United States;3        (3) an operating subsidiary where each owner of the 4    operating subsidiary is wholly owned by the same bank, 5    savings bank, savings association, or credit union 6    organized under the laws of the State or any other state or 7    under the laws of the United States;8        (4) the Illinois Student Assistance Commission and its 9    agents when the agents are acting on the Illinois Student 10    Assistance Commission's behalf;11        (5) a public postsecondary educational institution or 12    a private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution 13    servicing a student loan it extended to the borrower;14        (6) a licensed debt management service under the Debt 15    Management Service Act, except to the extent that the 16    organization acts as a subcontractor, affiliate, or 17    service provider for an entity that is otherwise subject 18    to licensure under this Act;19        (7) any collection agency licensed under the 20    Collection Agency Act that is collecting post-default 21    debt;22        (8) in connection with its responsibilities as a 23    guaranty agency engaged in default aversion, a State or 24    nonprofit private institution or organization having an 25    agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 26    Section 428(b) of the Higher Education Act (20 U.S.C.   SB1537 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    1078(B)); 2        (9) a State institution or a nonprofit private 3    organization designated by a governmental entity to make 4    or service student loans, provided in each case that the 5    institution or organization services fewer than 20,000 6    student loan accounts of borrowers who reside in Illinois; 7        (10) a law firm or licensed attorney that is 8    collecting post-default debt; or 9        (11) the State Treasurer. 10    "Total and permanent disability" means a physical or 11mental impairment, disease, or loss of a permanent nature that 12prevents employment with or without reasonable accommodation, 13with proof of disability being in the form of a declaration 14from the United States Social Security Administration, the 15Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission, the United States 16Department of Defense, or an insurer authorized to transact 17business in this State who is providing disability insurance 18coverage to a contractor. The term does not include a 19condition that has not progressed or been exacerbated or that 20the individual did not acquire until after the closing of the 21loan agreement. In addition, documentation sufficient to 22establish a total and permanent disability for a federal 23student loan made pursuant to Title IV of the federal Higher 24Education Act of 1965 is sufficient to establish a total and 25permanent disability under this Act. 26(Source: P.A. 103-748, eff. 8-2-24.)   SB1537 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    (110 ILCS 992/Art. 7 heading new)2ARTICLE 7. EDUCATIONAL INCOME SHARE AGREEMENTS 3    (110 ILCS 992/7-1 new)4    Sec. 7-1. Purpose and construction. This Article shall be 5construed as a consumer-protection law for all purposes and 6shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose. 7    (110 ILCS 992/7-3 new)8    Sec. 7-3. Applicability. This Article applies only to 9educational income share agreements. 10    (110 ILCS 992/7-5 new)11    Sec. 7-5. Definitions. As used in this Article: 12    "Amount financed" means the amounts advanced by the EISA 13provider to the consumer or on behalf of the consumer, or if 14the EISA provider is a merchant financing the sale of goods or 15services to the consumer using an EISA, "amount financed" 16means the amount credited by the EISA provider toward the 17purchase of expenses described in the definition of 18"educational income share agreement".19    "Annual percentage rate" or "APR" means the percentage 20rate calculated according to the Federal Reserve Board's 21methodology as set forth under Regulation Z, 12 CFR Part 1026. 22The "annual percentage rate" of an EISA is the measure of the   SB1537 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1cost of the EISA, expressed as a yearly rate, that relates to 2the amount and timing of value received by the consumer to the 3amount and timing of payments made, including any charges or 4fees that would be included in the APR as set forth under 5Regulation Z, 12 CFR Part 1026. The "annual percentage rate" 6is determined in accordance with either the actuarial method 7or the United States rule method.8    "Cash price" has the meaning given in 12 CFR 1026.2(a)(9).9    "Consumer" means a natural person who enters into an EISA.10    "Educational income share agreement" or "EISA" means an 11agreement between a consumer and an EISA provider under which: 12        (1) the EISA provider credits or advances a sum of 13    money to the consumer or to a third party on the consumer's 14    behalf or, if the EISA provider is a seller of goods or 15    services to the consumer, the EISA provider credits or 16    advances toward the purchase of such goods or services;17        (2) the consumer is obligated to make periodic 18    payments, if any become due, to the EISA provider 19    calculated, based upon, or determined by the consumer's 20    income;21        (3) the consumer incurs an obligation in each payment 22    period only if the individual's income in that period is 23    above an income threshold specified in the EISA;24        (4) there is an EISA duration after which the 25    obligation is complete, regardless of how much has been 26    paid, as long as the consumer has paid any prior amounts   SB1537 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    due;2        (5) each of these elements is available at the time 3    the agreement is executed;4        (6) the agreement is not made, insured, or guaranteed 5    under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 6    or another federally subsidized educational finance 7    program; and8        (7) the agreement is extended to a consumer expressly, 9    in whole or in part, for postsecondary educational 10    expenses, tuition, or other obligations of, or pay amounts 11    to or on behalf of such an individual, for the costs 12    associated with a postsecondary training program or any 13    other program designed to increase the individual's human 14    capital, employability, or earning potential, including, 15    but not limited to, a program eligible to participate as a 16    program under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act 17    of 1965, as well as any personal expenses, such as books, 18    supplies, transportation, and living costs, incurred by 19    the individual while enrolled in such a program and any 20    other costs or expenses included in the definition of 21    "qualified higher education expenses" under 26 U.S.C. 22    529(e)(3)(A), including the refinancing of loans or 23    agreements used for the purposes described in this 24    paragraph (7) and regardless of whether the agreement is 25    provided by the educational institution that the consumer 26    attends.   SB1537 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1        For purposes of this definition, an EISA shall be 2    treated as a credit, within the meaning of that term under 3    15 U.S.C. 1602(f), and as a "private education loan", 4    within the meaning of that term under 15 U.S.C. 5    1650(a)(8), to the extent the proceeds of the EISA are 6    used for postsecondary educational expenses in a manner 7    consistent with the definition of that term. 8    "EISA duration" means the maximum time during which a 9consumer could remain obligated on the EISA, other than 10periods when an EISA provider is attempting to collect 11past-due amounts and absent periods of payment relief pauses, 12forbearance, military service suspension, or other suspension 13of obligations at the request of the consumer, regardless of 14whether the consumer's income is greater than the minimum 15income. 16    "EISA maximum number of payments" means the maximum number 17of EISA payments during EISA payment periods in which the 18consumer's income is equal to or greater than the income 19threshold that a consumer could be required to make under the 20terms of the EISA. "EISA maximum number of payments" does not 21include periods of payment relief pause. 22    "EISA payment" means a calculated monthly payment in 23excess of $0.00 that counts toward the maximum income-based 24payments under the EISA. An "EISA payment" is required only 25for income earned during an EISA payment period in which the 26consumer's income was equal to or greater than the income   SB1537 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1threshold. 2    "EISA payment calculation method" means the mechanism, 3formula, percentage, dollar figure, or other means of 4calculating a student's payment obligation, based on the 5student's income, under the terms of the EISA. 6    "EISA payment cap" means the maximum amount of money a 7consumer must pay to satisfy the terms of an EISA, which may be 8expressed as a dollar value, a multiple of the amount funded to 9the student or on the student's behalf, or as a maximum 10effective annual percentage rate. 11    "EISA payment cap" does not include charges that would be 12excluded from the definition of the term "finance charge" 13under 12 CFR 1026. 14    "EISA provider" means: 15        (1) a person or entity that provides money, payments, 16    or credits to or on behalf of a consumer pursuant to the 17    terms of an EISA;18        (2) any person or entity engaged in the business of 19    soliciting, making, funding, or extending EISAs; or20        (3) any person or entity that is providing educational 21    services to the consumer and receiving compensation from 22    an EISA provider (separate from proceeds of the EISA to 23    cover educational expenses of the consumer) for 24    advertising, marketing, or recommending EISAs, on behalf 25    of an EISA provider, for those educational services.26    This definition does not apply to an entity that either   SB1537 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1(i) has no direct interactions with the consumer and is not 2responsible for making credit decisions regarding the consumer 3or (ii) is the provider of the educational services to the 4consumer, unless the entity qualifies under paragraph (1), 5(2), or (3). 6    "Federal poverty guidelines" means the poverty guidelines 7updated periodically in the Federal Register by the U.S. 8Department of Health and Human Services under the authority of 942 U.S.C. 9902(2).10    "Garnishment" means any legal or equitable procedure 11through which earnings of an individual are required to be 12withheld for payment of obligations to an EISA provider as set 13forth in the Code of Civil Procedure.14    "Income threshold" means a fixed dollar amount that is the 15minimum income per payment period that an EISA recipient is 16required to earn before the EISA recipient is required to make 17a payment on an EISA for such payment period.18    "Index" means the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage 19Earners and Clerical Workers: U.S. City Average, All Items, 201967=100, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United 21States Department of Labor. 22    "Payment relief pause" means a period of time that is 23requested by the consumer during which the consumer is not 24required to make payments despite the consumer's income 25exceeding the income threshold. 26    "Sales price" means the "total sale price" as set forth in   SB1537 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b112 CFR 1026.18(j).  2    (110 ILCS 992/7-10 new)3    Sec. 7-10. Monthly payment affordability.4    (a) Each EISA shall specify the EISA payment calculation 5method applicable to the EISA. An EISA shall not require 6payments from the consumer toward that EISA that exceed 8% of 7the consumer's income. An EISA provider shall not enter into 8an EISA with a consumer if the consumer would be committing to 9pay more than 15% of the consumer's income at any time during 10the EISA duration, based on information available to the EISA 11provider at the time of the projection, inclusive of any 12payment obligations that the EISA provider knows will arise in 13the future for other EISAs and education loans upon which the 14consumer is obligated at the time of the projection. The EISA 15provider must confirm a consumer's EISA and education loan 16liabilities through a verifiable third-party source. At a 17minimum, the EISA provider must confirm such liabilities using 18information maintained by a nationwide consumer reporting 19agency, as defined by 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f), and doing so is 20sufficient for meeting the requirement in this subsection. 21However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit an EISA 22provider from using other sources to provide additional 23verification. For the purposes of calculating the portion of a 24student's future income that would be consumed by the EISA for 25which the student has applied and other EISAs and education   SB1537 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1loans known at the time, the EISA provider shall calculate the 2aggregate future burden of all such obligations, including the 3EISA for which the student is applying, at the hypothetical 4future income levels described in subdivision (a)(15)(iii) of 5Section 7-75, ranging from the income threshold of the EISA 6for which the student has applied up to the maximum income 7described in subdivision (a)(15)(iii) of Section 7-75. The 8terms of the EISA for which the student has applied cannot 9cause the student's aggregate future burden to exceed the 10percentage limits in this subsection at any of the income 11increments stated in this Section. For the purpose of 12calculating the percentage burden of an EISA at a given future 13income level, the EISA provider shall use the EISA payment 14amount that would be applicable for the EISA at such income 15level. For the purpose of calculating the percentage burden of 16an educational loan at a given future income level, the EISA 17provider shall divide the annual payment obligation by income 18level using the most affordable payment plan or option which 19would yield the lowest monthly payments that would be 20available to the student at such income level under such loan. 21For students enrolled in a program eligible to receive federal 22student loans under Title IV of the federal Higher Education 23Act of 1965, as part of this analysis the EISA provider shall 24assume a federal loan balance equal to the larger of (1) the 25student's existing federal loan balance and (2) the aggregate 26maximum amount the student is eligible to borrow under Federal   SB1537 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1Direct Stafford Loans for the student's status, dependent or 2independent.3    (b) The EISA must state that when a consumer has income 4that is equal to or below the income threshold set forth in the 5EISA that the consumer's payment obligation is zero dollars. 6The income threshold must be equal to or greater than $47,000; 7however, that amount shall be increased on January 1, 2026, 8and every other January 1 thereafter, by the annual unadjusted 9percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the index for 10the 12 months ending with the preceding September, including 11all previous adjustments.12    (c) An EISA must offer at least 3 months of voluntary 13payment relief pauses for every 30 income-determined payments 14required under the EISA. 15    (d) During the payment process for the EISA, the consumer 16may request that the income threshold on the EISA be adjusted 17upward to ensure the consumer's income, less any payments 18required by the EISA, would be greater than or equal to the 19minimum essential income based on the consumer's current place 20of residence. 21    As used in this subsection (d), the consumer's minimum 22essential income is equal to 275% of the federal poverty 23guidelines for a single person (for the year in which the 24calculation is performed), multiplied by a cost-of-living 25adjustment factor equal to the ratio of (i) one plus the 26current locality payment percentage issued by the U.S. Office   SB1537 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1of Personnel Management for the locality pay area in which the 2consumer resides, divided by (ii) one plus the current 3locality payment percentage issued by the U.S. Office of 4Personnel Management for the "Rest of U.S." locality pay area. 5The locality pay areas described in this subsection (d) are 6the locality pay areas described in 5 CFR 531.603. 7    An EISA provider must notify consumers of this option on 8each monthly billing statement. Nothing in this provision 9shall prevent an EISA provider from taking reasonable steps to 10confirm a consumer's place of residence (such as requiring a 11copy of a utility bill or a driver's license) for the purpose 12of establishing the consumer's minimum essential income, 13including if the EISA provider believes a consumer's place of 14residence has changed. Furthermore, an EISA provider may 15require that a consumer has resided at a location for at least 1690 days before adjusting the consumer's minimum essential 17income. 18    The requirements for repayment options in subsection (k) 19of Section 5-30 apply to this Section.  20    (110 ILCS 992/7-15 new)21    Sec. 7-15. Maximum effective annual percentage rate. An 22EISA must specify that the maximum amount that a consumer 23could be required to pay under the EISA will not result in a 24consumer ever being required to pay an effective annual 25percentage rate that is greater than 9% or the high yield of   SB1537 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1the 10-year United States Constant Maturity Treasury Notes 2auctioned at the final auction held before the current 3calendar year in which the EISA is originated plus 6%, 4whichever is greater. If at any time the EISA provider accepts 5a payment of an amount that would cause the limit in this 6Section to apply, the EISA provider shall, within 20 calendar 7days, refund any amounts necessary to ensure that the 8consumer's payments do not result in an effective annual 9percentage rate that is greater than the limit specified in 10this Section. 11    (110 ILCS 992/7-20 new)12    Sec. 7-20. Limits on duration of EISAs.13    (a) The EISA maximum number of payments shall not exceed 14180 monthly payments.15    (b) The EISA duration shall not exceed 240 months, 16excluding any months in which a consumer has requested and 17received a payment relief pause.  18    (110 ILCS 992/7-25 new)19    Sec. 7-25. Risk sharing.20    (a) An EISA provider may not contract for EISA terms that 21would result in a consumer having income that is less than or 22equal to 450% of the federal poverty guidelines for a single 23person for the EISA duration being required to make a stream of 24EISA payments that would yield an effective APR greater than   SB1537 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b18.5%, or the high yield of the 10-year United States Constant 2Maturity Treasury Notes auctioned at the final auction held 3before the current calendar year in which an EISA offering is 4made plus 4.5%, whichever is greater.5    (b) An EISA provider shall calculate the effective APR in 6subsection (a) by determining the federal poverty guidelines 7at the time the consumer's EISA is originated and assuming 8such amount is fixed through the EISA duration.9    (c) For the purposes of determining EISA duration in this 10Section, an EISA provider shall assume the EISA duration 11started after a period equal to the expected length of the 12program for which a consumer is enrolling.13    (d) If there is a discrepancy between the effective annual 14percentage rate as calculated in this Section and the maximum 15effective annual percentage rate as calculated in Section 167-15, the lower effective annual percentage rate shall apply 17in this Section 7-25.  18    (110 ILCS 992/7-30 new)19    Sec. 7-30. Limits on covered income. An EISA must specify 20the definition of income to be used for the purposes of 21calculating a consumer's payment obligation under the EISA. No 22EISA shall include any of the following in its definition of 23income:24        (1) the income of the consumer's spouse, children, or 25    dependents or a party to a civil union with the consumer   SB1537 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    under the Illinois Religious Freedom and Civil Union Act; 2    or3        (2) any amount paid by the consumer under Title II or 4    XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 401 et seq. or 42 5    U.S.C. 1381 et seq., or under a State program funded by 6    Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq;7        (3) individual retirement account distributions;8        (4) pensions and annuities;9        (5) social security benefits;10        (6) any sources of government aid provided to 11    individuals, including, but not limited to:12            (A) unemployment programs;13            (B) disaster relief programs;14            (C) Medicare or Medicaid benefits;15            (D) benefits received through the Supplemental 16        Nutrition Assistance Program;17            (E) economic impact payments;18            (F) the earned income tax credit or child tax 19        credit;20            (G) other income excluded from the definition of 21        taxable income set forth by the Internal Revenue 22        Service; or23            (H) passive income that is not derived as a result 24        of a consumer's active participation in any trade or 25        business.   SB1537 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    (110 ILCS 992/7-35 new)2    Sec. 7-35. Fees permitted.     (a) In addition to the EISA 3obligation permitted by this Act, an EISA provider may 4contract for and receive the following additional charges:5        (1) government fees and taxes;6        (2) a fee, which shall not exceed the sum of $25, for a 7    failure to provide documentation to the EISA provider for 8    the confirmation and reconciliation of the consumer's 9    income within 30 days after the date on which such 10    documentation is due, as reflected in the written notice 11    to the consumer;12        (3) a fee for processing any forms to confirm the 13    consumer's income with the United States Internal Revenue 14    Service or a state department of revenue or taxation on a 15    dollar-for-dollar, pass-through basis of the expenses 16    incurred by the EISA provider;17        (4) a late payment fee in the amount of $15 or 5% of 18    the late payment, whichever is less, for any payment that 19    is more than 15 days past due; no late payment fee may be 20    charged more than once per late payment;21        (5) an amount not exceeding $25, plus any actual 22    expenses incurred in connection with a check or draft that 23    is not honored because of insufficient or uncollected 24    funds or because no such account exists; and25        (6) other fees authorized by the Secretary.26    In determining whether to authorize a charge, the   SB1537 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1Secretary shall consider whether the charge benefits the 2consumer and is reasonable.3    (b) Before or after default in payment of a scheduled 4payment of an EISA, the parties to the EISA may agree in 5writing to a deferral of all or part of one or more unpaid 6payments and the EISA provider may make, at the time of 7deferral and receive at that time or at any time thereafter, a 8deferral charge not exceeding an amount equal to 5% of the 9missed payment, except that this subsection (b) shall not 10apply to voluntary payment relief pauses. 11    (110 ILCS 992/7-40 new)12    Sec. 7-40. Restriction on security interest. Under no 13circumstances shall an EISA provider take a security interest 14in any collateral in connection with an EISA. 15    (110 ILCS 992/7-41 new)16    Sec. 7-41. Refinancing. Before offering a person an EISA 17that is being used to refinance an existing loan, an EISA 18provider shall provide the person with a disclosure explaining 19that the benefits and protections applicable to the existing 20loan may be lost due to the refinancing. The disclosure must be 21provided on a one-page information sheet in at least 12-point 22type and must be written in simple, clear, understandable, and 23easily readable language.   SB1537 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    (110 ILCS 992/7-45 new)2    Sec. 7-45. Discharge of obligations.3    (a) All obligations under an EISA shall terminate if the 4consumer is deemed totally and permanently disabled by the 5applicable governmental agency.6    (b) All obligations under an EISA shall terminate upon the 7death of the consumer. 8    (c) The requirements for total and permanent disability of 9a borrower or cosigner in subsections (b) through (e) of 10Section 5-85 that apply to borrowers apply to this Section.  11    (110 ILCS 992/7-50 new)12    Sec. 7-50. Prohibition on cosigners. No EISA shall include 13or permit the use of a cosigner in connection with any 14obligation related to an EISA. 15    (110 ILCS 992/7-55 new)16    Sec. 7-55. Limitation on acceleration.17    (a) EISA providers shall not attempt to accelerate or 18otherwise liquidate a future payment stream under an EISA.19    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), nothing in this 20Section shall prevent an EISA provider from collecting or 21pursuing any other remedy available to the EISA provider for 22the collection of amounts that were due from the consumer 23under an EISA that were not paid or properly remitted to the 24EISA provider. Nothing in this Section shall prevent an EISA   SB1537 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1provider from calculating a projected future income for a 2consumer and calculating a consumer's payment obligation using 3that projection if the consumer does not provide contractually 4obligated documentation of income.5    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an EISA may contain a 6provision that allows a consumer to terminate the consumer's 7EISA before the events terminating further obligations under 8the EISA. The early termination mechanisms, such as total caps 9on payments due to the EISA provider or other rights to 10partially or fully terminate further obligations under the 11EISA, must be optional to the consumer and within the 12consumer's control. In such circumstances, such mechanisms 13shall not be deemed a form of acceleration.  14    (110 ILCS 992/7-60 new)15    Sec. 7-60. No assignment of wages.16    (a) An EISA provider may not take an assignment of 17earnings or wages of the consumer for payment or as security 18for payment of a debt arising out of an EISA. An assignment of 19earnings in violation of this Section is unenforceable by the 20assignee of the earnings and revocable by the consumer. This 21Section does not limit the ability of the consumer to 22voluntarily elect to use a revocable payroll deduction 23mechanism, such as one offered by an employer or payroll 24provider, provided that the consumer is not assigning the 25consumer's earnings or wages.  SB1537 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    (b) A sale of unpaid earnings made in consideration of the 2payment of money to or for the account of the seller of the 3earnings is deemed to be a loan to the seller secured by an 4assignment of earnings.  5    (110 ILCS 992/7-65 new)6    Sec. 7-65. Limitations on garnishment. Before entry of 7judgment in an action against a consumer for a payment arising 8from an EISA, a licensee may not attach unpaid earnings of the 9consumer by garnishment or like proceedings. 10    (110 ILCS 992/7-70 new)11    Sec. 7-70. Use of multiple agreements. An EISA provider 12shall not use multiple agreements with respect to a single 13EISA with intent to violate any limitations of this Act. 14    (110 ILCS 992/7-75 new)15    Sec. 7-75. Required disclosures.16    (a) An EISA provider shall disclose the following 17information to each consumer, clearly and conspicuously, in a 18form that the consumer can keep at the time the transaction is 19consummated:20        (1) the date of the EISA;21        (2) the dollar amount of the amount financed;22        (3) the sales price of the transaction if different 23    from the amount financed;  SB1537 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1        (4) the EISA payment calculation method, including any 2    percentages used in the EISA payment calculation method, 3    which shall be rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of 1% 4    if the percentage is not a whole number;5        (5) the maximum number of payments expressed as a 6    whole number;7        (6) the maximum duration expressed as a whole number 8    of the period of time;9        (7) the income threshold expressed as a dollar amount 10    and a statement that payments will only be required during 11    periods when the consumer's income is equal to or exceeds 12    the income threshold;13        (8) an itemization of the amount financed and, if the 14    EISA provider is a seller of goods or services, an 15    itemization of the amount of any down payment and any 16    additional fees or costs;17        (9) the definition of "income" to be used for the 18    purposes of calculating the consumer's obligations under 19    the EISA;20        (10) a description of the terms under which the 21    obligations of the consumer under the EISA will be 22    extinguished before the full EISA duration;23        (11) a payment schedule that shows the date on which 24    the first payment will be due and reflects each date 25    thereafter during the EISA duration that a payment may be 26    due;  SB1537 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1        (12) an itemization of any permissible fees associated 2    with the EISA;3        (13) a description of the methods used by the EISA 4    provider to engage in a process of reconciliation and 5    verification to determine if the consumer's payments are 6    more than, equal to, or less than the payments owed by the 7    consumer under the consumer's EISA; this description shall 8    include the following:9            (i) a description of the frequency or triggers for 10        the commencement of the income verification process;11            (ii) a description of the requirements and timing 12        of the process in which the consumer must participate 13        in order for the EISA provider to verify the 14        consumer's income; and15            (iii) a description of any records or forms, 16        including tax records, that the consumer may be 17        required to execute or submit;18        (14) the name and address of the EISA provider;19        (15) a table that displays the dollar amounts of each 20    payment, the number of payments, the effective annual 21    percentage rate, and the total of all payments that a 22    consumer would be required to pay under the EISA at a range 23    of annual income levels based on the EISA duration and 24    that includes a statement that "This comparison table is 25    for illustrative purposes only and may not reflect the 26    amounts that you are likely to pay under this educational   SB1537 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    income share agreement. This table assumes you have the 2    same income over the entire term of your educational 3    income share agreement. It does not take into account 4    changes in income. Your income will likely change over 5    time. This table does not represent the income or range of 6    incomes that you are likely to earn in the future.". In 7    computing the APR, the EISA provider shall use the amount 8    financed and may assume that the EISA will be disbursed in 9    the amount and with the disbursement schedule that it 10    reasonably expects to follow for such EISA and that 11    payments would commence on the date set forth in the EISA. 12    The income used in this disclosure shall include, at 13    minimum, the obligations at the following incomes:14            (i) no income;15            (ii) income equal to the annual equivalent of the 16        income threshold;17            (iii) various income scenarios with at least 18        calculations at annual incomes of $40,000, $60,000, 19        $80,000, $100,000, $125,000, $150,000, $175,000, and 20        $200,000; and21            (iv) if known by the EISA provider, the consumer's 22        current income;23        (16) a statement that the EISA is not a fixed payment 24    installment loan and that the amount the consumer will be 25    required to pay under the EISA:26            (i) may be more or less than the amount financed by   SB1537 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1        the EISA provider; and2            (ii) will vary in proportion with the consumer's 3        income; and4        (17) a statement relating to the bankruptcy treatment 5    of the EISA consistent with the requirements set forth in 6    12 CFR 1026.47(a)(3)(iv), as it may be amended or 7    interpreted. 8    (b) The disclosures required by this Section shall be 9grouped together and segregated from all other information.10    (c) The disclosures required by this Section may be 11provided to a consumer in electronic form, subject to 12compliance with the consumer's consent and other applicable 13provisions of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National 14Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., and applicable State 15law.16    (d) If model documents are established pursuant to any 17federal law covering income share agreements, compliance with 18those forms shall be considered compliance with this Act with 19respect to the disclosure requirements contained in this Act.  20    (110 ILCS 992/7-80 new)21    Sec. 7-80. Early completion. An EISA shall specify the 22terms and conditions by which the consumer may extinguish the 23consumer's obligations under the EISA before the end of the 24EISA's duration. An EISA must not include a prepayment penalty 25that violates the prohibition found in 15 U.S.C. 1650(e), as   SB1537 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1it may be amended or interpreted. A consumer may always cancel 2an EISA by making aggregate payments, excluding payments to 3fees, equal to the EISA payment cap. The consumer is entitled 4to this early completion regardless of whether the consumer 5makes this early completion payment by making regularly 6scheduled payments or by making a single lump-sum payment in 7the amount of the early completion payment.8    This Section shall create an early completion mechanism 9for EISAs that is in lieu of other State laws regarding 10prepayment penalties. 11    (110 ILCS 992/7-85 new)12    Sec. 7-85. Assumption of increase in future income.13    (a) If a consumer fails to provide income documentation as 14reasonably required by an EISA, an EISA provider may assign an 15amount of income to the consumer and compute the consumer's 16monthly payment amount by any of the following methods, to the 17extent disclosed in the EISA:18        (1) assigning an income amount obtained from a 19    reasonably reliable third party or a credit reporting 20    agency;21        (2) if the consumer previously provided income 22    documentation or has had an income assigned in the prior 23    12-month period that has increased by an amount not to 24    exceed 10%, but such increase may not be applied more than 25    once per 12-month period;  SB1537 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1        (3) contacting the Department of Revenue or the 2    Internal Revenue Service to obtain the most recent 3    information available about the student's income; or4        (4) assigning a reasonable qualified income based on 5    the incomes of the nearest reasonably relevant quantile of 6    income of consumers who attended the same or a reasonably 7    comparable covered educational program or course of study, 8    as determined by information published by the Bureau of 9    Labor Statistics or other reasonably reliable publicly 10    available data sources.11    (b) If an EISA provider assigns an income to a consumer's 12EISA, then it shall notify the consumer in the monthly billing 13statement, and in each billing statement thereafter while the 14assigned income remains applicable to the consumer's EISA, 15that income has been assigned and of the consumer's rights 16under this Section.17    (c) If the consumer does provide income information as 18reasonably required by the EISA within one year of the date on 19which the EISA provider notified the consumer that assigned 20income will be applied to the EISA, then, within 15 days after 21the EISA provider's receipt of such information, the EISA 22provider shall update each prior instance in which assigned 23income was applied using the income information provided by 24the consumer; if the consumer provides income information more 25than one year after the EISA provider first assigned income to 26the consumer's EISA, then the EISA provider may, but is not   SB1537 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1obligated to, update each prior instance in which assigned 2income was applied using the income information provided by 3the consumer.4    (d) An EISA provider that assigns income to an EISA shall 5retain all applicable records relating to the method and data 6sources used to make such estimation for 3 years after the end 7of that EISA.  8    (110 ILCS 992/7-90 new)9    Sec. 7-90. Receipts; statements of account; evidence of 10payment.11    (a) The EISA provider shall deliver or mail to the 12consumer, without request, a written receipt for each payment 13made pursuant to an EISA. A periodic statement showing a 14payment received by mail complies with this subsection (a).15    (b) An EISA provider shall provide a written payment 16history to a borrower upon request at no cost within 21 17calendar days of receiving the request.18    (c) An EISA provider shall indicate on its website that a 19borrower may request a payoff statement. An EISA provider 20shall provide the payoff statement within 10 days, including 21information the requester needs to pay off the loan. If a 22payoff is made, the EISA provider must send a paid-in-full 23notice within 30 days.  24    (110 ILCS 992/7-95 new)  SB1537 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    Sec. 7-95. Adjustment of dollar amounts.2    (a) From time to time, the dollar amounts in this Act 3designated as subject to change shall change, as provided in 4this Section, according to and to the extent of changes in the 5index.6    (b) The index for December of the year preceding the year 7in which this Act becomes effective is the reference base 8index.9    (c) The designated dollar amounts shall change on July 1 10of each even-numbered year if the percentage of change, 11calculated to the nearest whole percentage point, between the 12index and the end of the preceding year and the reference base 13index is 10% or more, but:14        (1) the portion of the percentage change in the index 15    in excess of a multiple of 10% shall be disregarded and the 16    dollar amounts shall change only in multiples of 10% of 17    the amounts provided in this Act on the date of enactment; 18    and19        (2) the dollar amounts shall not change if the amounts 20    required by this Section are those currently in effect 21    pursuant to this Act as a result of earlier application of 22    this Section.23    (d) If the index is revised, the percentage of change 24pursuant to this Section shall be calculated on the basis of 25the revised index. If a revision of the index changes the 26reference base index, a revised reference base index shall be   SB1537 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1determined by multiplying the reference base index then 2applicable by the rebasing factor furnished by the Bureau of 3Labor Statistics. If the index is superseded, the index 4referred to in this Section is the one represented by the 5Bureau of Labor Statistics as reflecting most accurately 6changes in the purchasing power of the dollar for consumers.7    (e) The Department shall adopt a rule setting forth, on or 8before April 30 of each year in which dollar amounts are to 9change, the changes in dollar amounts required by this 10Section. As soon as practical after the changes occur, the 11Department shall adopt a rule setting forth the changes in the 12index required by subsection (d), including, if applicable, 13the numerical equivalent of the reference base index under a 14revised reference base index and the designation or title of 15any index superseding the index.16    (f) A person does not violate this Act with respect to a 17transaction otherwise complying with this Act if the person 18relies on dollar amounts either determined according to 19subsection (c) or appearing in the last rule of the Department 20announcing the then-current dollar amounts.  21    (110 ILCS 992/7-100 new)22    Sec. 7-100. Construction against implicit authority. This 23Act is a general Act intended as a unified coverage of its 24subject matter. No part of this Act shall be construed to be 25impliedly repealed by subsequent law if that construction can   SB1537 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1reasonably be avoided. 2    (110 ILCS 992/7-105 new)3    Sec. 7-105. Application of other Acts. EISAs and EISA 4providers are subject to other Articles of this Act, the Know 5Before You Owe Private Education Loan Act, and the Predatory 6Loan Prevention Act and shall comply with their requirements 7and any rules adopted by the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation pursuant to those Acts. Nothing in 9this Section is intended to imply that: (i) an EISA is not a 10credit transaction or (ii) an EISA does not create a debt upon 11the accrual of an obligation under the EISA. 12    (110 ILCS 992/7-110 new)13    Sec. 7-110. Rulemaking. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Act, the Secretary may adopt rules for the 15regulation of any EISA provider that does not engage in the 16servicing of student loans, including, but not limited to, 17EISAs. The Secretary's authority to adopt rules shall include, 18but is not limited to, licensure, examination, supervision, 19investigation, confidentiality, and enforcement. The rules 20adopted by the Secretary shall not incorporate any provision 21of Article 1, 5, 10, 15, 20, or 25 of this Act if that 22provision conflicts with this Article. 23    (110 ILCS 992/25-5)  SB1537 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    Sec. 25-5. Enforcement; Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 2Business Practices Act. The Attorney General may enforce a 3violation of Article 5 or 7 of this Act as an unlawful practice 4under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.5(Source: P.A. 100-540, eff. 12-31-18.) 6    Section 10. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended 7by changing Section 1 as follows: 8    (205 ILCS 670/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5401)9    Sec. 1. License required to engage in business. No person, 10partnership, association, limited liability company, or 11corporation shall engage in the business of making loans of 12money and charge, contract for, or receive on any such loan a 13greater annual percentage rate than 9% except as authorized by 14this Act after first obtaining a license from the Director of 15Financial Institutions (hereinafter called the Director). No 16licensee, or employee or affiliate thereof, that is licensed 17under the Payday Loan Reform Act shall obtain a license under 18this Act except that a licensee under the Payday Loan Reform 19Act may obtain a license under this Act for the exclusive 20purpose and use of making title-secured loans, as defined in 21subsection (a) of Section 15 of this Act and governed by Title 2238, Section 110.300 of the Illinois Administrative Code. For 23the purpose of this Section, "affiliate" means any person or 24entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by,   SB1537 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1or shares control with another person or entity. A person or 2entity has control over another if the person or entity has an 3ownership interest of 25% or more in the other. A person or 4entity licensed to provide educational income share agreements 5is exempt from the requirements of this Act to the extent of 6its operation under Article 7 of the Student Loan Servicing 7Rights Act.8    In this Act, "Director" means the Director of Financial 9Institutions of the Department of Financial and Professional 10Regulation. 11(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 12    Section 15. The Interest Act is amended by changing 13Section 4 as follows: 14    (815 ILCS 205/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6404)15    Sec. 4. General interest rate. 16    (1) Except as otherwise provided in Section 4.05, in all 17written contracts it shall be lawful for the parties to 18stipulate or agree that an annual percentage rate of 9%, or any 19less sum, shall be taken and paid upon every $100 of money 20loaned or in any manner due and owing from any person to any 21other person or corporation in this state, and after that rate 22for a greater or less sum, or for a longer or shorter time, 23except as herein provided.24    The maximum rate of interest that may lawfully be   SB1537 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1contracted for is determined by the law applicable thereto at 2the time the contract is made. Any provision in any contract, 3whether made before or after July 1, 1969, which provides for 4or purports to authorize, contingent upon a change in the 5Illinois law after the contract is made, any rate of interest 6greater than the maximum lawful rate at the time the contract 7is made, is void.8    It is lawful for a state bank or a branch of an 9out-of-state bank, as those terms are defined in Section 2 of 10the Illinois Banking Act, to receive or to contract to receive 11and collect interest and charges at any rate or rates agreed 12upon by the bank or branch and the borrower. It is lawful for a 13savings bank chartered under the Savings Bank Act or a savings 14association chartered under the Illinois Savings and Loan Act 15of 1985 to receive or contract to receive and collect interest 16and charges at any rate agreed upon by the savings bank or 17savings association and the borrower.18    It is lawful to receive or to contract to receive and 19collect interest and charges as authorized by this Act and as 20authorized by the Consumer Installment Loan Act, the Payday 21Loan Reform Act, the Retail Installment Sales Act, the 22Illinois Financial Services Development Act, the Motor Vehicle 23Retail Installment Sales Act, or the Consumer Legal Funding 24Act, or the Student Loan Servicing Rights Act. It is lawful to 25charge, contract for, and receive any rate or amount of 26interest or compensation, except as otherwise provided in the   SB1537 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1Predatory Loan Prevention Act, with respect to the following 2transactions:3        (a) Any loan made to a corporation;4        (b) Advances of money, repayable on demand, to an 5    amount not less than $5,000, which are made upon warehouse 6    receipts, bills of lading, certificates of stock, 7    certificates of deposit, bills of exchange, bonds or other 8    negotiable instruments pledged as collateral security for 9    such repayment, if evidenced by a writing;10        (c) Any credit transaction between a merchandise 11    wholesaler and retailer; any business loan to a business 12    association or copartnership or to a person owning and 13    operating a business as sole proprietor or to any persons 14    owning and operating a business as joint venturers, joint 15    tenants or tenants in common, or to any limited 16    partnership, or to any trustee owning and operating a 17    business or whose beneficiaries own and operate a 18    business, except that any loan which is secured (1) by an 19    assignment of an individual obligor's salary, wages, 20    commissions or other compensation for services, or (2) by 21    his household furniture or other goods used for his 22    personal, family or household purposes shall be deemed not 23    to be a loan within the meaning of this subsection; and 24    provided further that a loan which otherwise qualifies as 25    a business loan within the meaning of this subsection 26    shall not be deemed as not so qualifying because of the   SB1537 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    inclusion, with other security consisting of business 2    assets of any such obligor, of real estate occupied by an 3    individual obligor solely as his residence. The term 4    "business" shall be deemed to mean a commercial, 5    agricultural or industrial enterprise which is carried on 6    for the purpose of investment or profit, but shall not be 7    deemed to mean the ownership or maintenance of real estate 8    occupied by an individual obligor solely as his residence;9        (d) Any loan made in accordance with the provisions of 10    Subchapter I of Chapter 13 of Title 12 of the United States 11    Code, which is designated as "Housing Renovation and 12    Modernization";13        (e) Any mortgage loan insured or upon which a 14    commitment to insure has been issued under the provisions 15    of the National Housing Act, Chapter 13 of Title 12 of the 16    United States Code;17        (f) Any mortgage loan guaranteed or upon which a 18    commitment to guaranty has been issued under the 19    provisions of the Veterans' Benefits Act, Subchapter II of 20    Chapter 37 of Title 38 of the United States Code;21        (g) Interest charged by a broker or dealer registered 22    under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or 23    registered under the Illinois Securities Law of 1953, 24    approved July 13, 1953, as now or hereafter amended, on a 25    debit balance in an account for a customer if such debit 26    balance is payable at will without penalty and is secured   SB1537 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    by securities as defined in Uniform Commercial 2    Code-Investment Securities;3        (h) Any loan made by a participating bank as part of 4    any loan guarantee program which provides for loans and 5    for the refinancing of such loans to medical students, 6    interns and residents and which are guaranteed by the 7    American Medical Association Education and Research 8    Foundation;9        (i) Any loan made, guaranteed, or insured in 10    accordance with the provisions of the Housing Act of 1949, 11    Subchapter III of Chapter 8A of Title 42 of the United 12    States Code and the Consolidated Farm and Rural 13    Development Act, Subchapters I, II, and III of Chapter 50 14    of Title 7 of the United States Code;15        (j) Any loan by an employee pension benefit plan, as 16    defined in Section 3 (2) of the Employee Retirement Income 17    Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1002), to an 18    individual participating in such plan, provided that such 19    loan satisfies the prohibited transaction exemption 20    requirements of Section 408 (b) (1) (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1108 21    (b) (1)) or Section 2003 (a) (26 U.S.C.A. Sec. 4975 (d) 22    (1)) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 23    1974;24        (k) Written contracts, agreements or bonds for deed 25    providing for installment purchase of real estate, 26    including a manufactured home as defined in subdivision   SB1537 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    (53) of Section 9-102 of the Uniform Commercial Code that 2    is real property as defined in the Conveyance and 3    Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 4    Severance Act;5        (l) Loans secured by a mortgage on real estate, 6    including a manufactured home as defined in subdivision 7    (53) of Section 9-102 of the Uniform Commercial Code that 8    is real property as defined in the Conveyance and 9    Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 10    Severance Act;11        (m) Loans made by a sole proprietorship, partnership, 12    or corporation to an employee or to a person who has been 13    offered employment by such sole proprietorship, 14    partnership, or corporation made for the sole purpose of 15    transferring an employee or person who has been offered 16    employment to another office maintained and operated by 17    the same sole proprietorship, partnership, or corporation;18        (n) Loans to or for the benefit of students made by an 19    institution of higher education.20    (2) Except for loans described in subparagraph (a), (c), 21(d), (e), (f) or (i) of subsection (1) of this Section, and 22except to the extent permitted by the applicable statute for 23loans made pursuant to Section 4a or pursuant to the Consumer 24Installment Loan Act:25        (a) Whenever the rate of interest exceeds an annual 26    percentage rate of 8% on any written contract, agreement   SB1537 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    or bond for deed providing for the installment purchase of 2    residential real estate, or on any loan secured by a 3    mortgage on residential real estate, it shall be unlawful 4    to provide for a prepayment penalty or other charge for 5    prepayment.6        (b) No agreement, note or other instrument evidencing 7    a loan secured by a mortgage on residential real estate, 8    or written contract, agreement or bond for deed providing 9    for the installment purchase of residential real estate, 10    may provide for any change in the contract rate of 11    interest during the term thereof. However, if the Congress 12    of the United States or any federal agency authorizes any 13    class of lender to enter, within limitations, into 14    mortgage contracts or written contracts, agreements or 15    bonds for deed in which the rate of interest may be changed 16    during the term of the contract, any person, firm, 17    corporation or other entity not otherwise prohibited from 18    entering into mortgage contracts or written contracts, 19    agreements or bonds for deed in Illinois may enter into 20    mortgage contracts or written contracts, agreements or 21    bonds for deed in which the rate of interest may be changed 22    during the term of the contract, within the same 23    limitations.24    (3) In any contract or loan which is secured by a mortgage, 25deed of trust, or conveyance in the nature of a mortgage, on 26residential real estate, the interest which is computed,   SB1537 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1calculated, charged, or collected pursuant to such contract or 2loan, or pursuant to any regulation or rule promulgated 3pursuant to this Act, may not be computed, calculated, charged 4or collected for any period of time occurring after the date on 5which the total indebtedness, with the exception of late 6payment penalties, is paid in full.7    (4) For purposes of this Section, a prepayment shall mean 8the payment of the total indebtedness, with the exception of 9late payment penalties if incurred or charged, on any date 10before the date specified in the contract or loan agreement on 11which the total indebtedness shall be paid in full, or before 12the date on which all payments, if timely made, shall have been 13made. In the event of a prepayment of the indebtedness which is 14made on a date after the date on which interest on the 15indebtedness was last computed, calculated, charged, or 16collected but before the next date on which interest on the 17indebtedness was to be calculated, computed, charged, or 18collected, the lender may calculate, charge and collect 19interest on the indebtedness for the period which elapsed 20between the date on which the prepayment is made and the date 21on which interest on the indebtedness was last computed, 22calculated, charged or collected at a rate equal to 1/360 of 23the annual rate for each day which so elapsed, which rate shall 24be applied to the indebtedness outstanding as of the date of 25prepayment. The lender shall refund to the borrower any 26interest charged or collected which exceeds that which the   SB1537 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1lender may charge or collect pursuant to the preceding 2sentence. The provisions of this amendatory Act of 1985 shall 3apply only to contracts or loans entered into on or after the 4effective date of this amendatory Act, but shall not apply to 5contracts or loans entered into on or after that date that are 6subject to Section 4a of this Act, the Consumer Installment 7Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, the Predatory Loan 8Prevention Act, or the Retail Installment Sales Act, or that 9provide for the refund of precomputed interest on prepayment 10in the manner provided by such Act.11    (5) For purposes of items (a) and (c) of subsection (1) of 12this Section, a rate or amount of interest may be lawfully 13computed when applying the ratio of the annual interest rate 14over a year based on 360 days. The provisions of this 15amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly are declarative of 16existing law. 17    (6) For purposes of this Section, "real estate" and "real 18property" include a manufactured home, as defined in 19subdivision (53) of Section 9-102 of the Uniform Commercial 20Code that is real property as defined in the Conveyance and 21Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 22Severance Act. 23(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21; 102-987, eff. 5-27-22.) 24    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 25severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.   SB1537 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.  SB1537 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    110 ILCS 992/1-54    110 ILCS 992/Art. 7 5    heading new6    110 ILCS 992/7-1 new7    110 ILCS 992/7-3 new8    110 ILCS 992/7-5 new9    110 ILCS 992/7-10 new10    110 ILCS 992/7-15 new11    110 ILCS 992/7-20 new12    110 ILCS 992/7-25 new13    110 ILCS 992/7-30 new14    110 ILCS 992/7-35 new15    110 ILCS 992/7-40 new16    110 ILCS 992/7-45 new17    110 ILCS 992/7-50 new18    110 ILCS 992/7-55 new19    110 ILCS 992/7-60 new20    110 ILCS 992/7-65 new21    110 ILCS 992/7-70 new22    110 ILCS 992/7-75 new23    110 ILCS 992/7-80 new24    110 ILCS 992/7-85 new25    110 ILCS 992/7-90 new  SB1537 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 08584 JDS 18636 b1    110 ILCS 992/7-95 new2    110 ILCS 992/7-100 new3    110 ILCS 992/7-105 new4    110 ILCS 992/7-110 new5    110 ILCS 992/25-56    205 ILCS 670/1from Ch. 17, par. 54017    815 ILCS 205/4from Ch. 17, par. 6404